Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-128
Clerical error, defined.

Clerical error means transposition of numbers, mathematical error, computer malfunction causing programming and printing errors, data entry error, items of real property other than land identified on the wrong parcel, incorrect ownership, or certification of an incorrect valuation to political subdivisions.

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 7.